Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB20.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 64.5277 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 64.5277 to 64.5279:
(1) "City" means:
(a) Any city of any class;
(b) An urban-county government that does not participate in the county officers training program under
KRS 64.5275; and
(c) A consolidated local government that does not participate in the county officers training program under
KRS 64.5275;
(2) "City officer" means:
(a) Any individual elected to a city office existing under KRS Chapter 83A;
(b) Any individual elected to a city office existing under KRS Chapter 67A or 67C, if the respective
government does not participate in the county officers training program under KRS 64.5275;
(c) Any individual appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected city office as defined under paragraph (a) or (b)
of this subsection; and
(d) Any individual serving in a nonelected city office as defined by KRS 83A.080 that is designated by the
city as eligible for participation in the city officers training program in the ordinance adopted pursuant
to KRS 64.5278;
(3) "Excess credit hours" means credit hours earned beyond fifteen (15) during a calendar year;
(4) "Training incentive multiplier" means a number of one (1) to four (4) that is used to calculate the final training
incentive to be paid to a city officer eligible to participate in the training incentive program; and
(5)[(4)] "Training unit" means fifteen (15) clock hours of attendance or participation in qualifying courses
during a calendar year.
Section 2. KRS 64.5278 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any city may elect, by adopting an ordinance meeting the requirements of this section, to establish an
incentive program for city officers to obtain educational training related to their duties and responsibilities as
city officers and the functions of city governments.
(2) The ordinance shall apply to all elected city officers within the city, and the city may allow any nonelected city
officer holding an office existing or created under KRS 83A.080 to participate in the incentive program.
(3) The ordinance shall establish[designate] a base [training ]incentive [payment ]amount that shall be awarded to
the city officer for the completion of a training unit during service as a city officer within the city. The city
may establish a different[This] base incentive [payment ]amount for each type of city officer covered under
the ordinance[shall be no less than one hundred dollars ($100) and no more than five hundred dollars ($500)].
The base[training] incentive [payment ]amount established in the ordinance shall not be adjusted by any index
reporting changes to consumer prices or any other method to account for inflation.
(4) The ordinance shall require city officers to complete a number of continuing education hours equal to at least
one (1) training unit during each calendar year in order to receive a training incentive payment.
(5) The ordinance shall state that the city shall award the training incentive payment to the city officer for the
completion of a training unit during the calendar year. The training incentive payment awarded shall be the
base [training ]incentive amount[payment] multiplied by the training incentive multiplier earned by the city
officer. The city officer shall accumulate no more than one (1) training incentive multiplier per calendar year
of continuous service, for a maximum of four (4) training incentive multipliers.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) The ordinance shall provide that a city officer who fails to earn at least one (1) training unit in any calendar
year shall receive no training incentive payment for that calendar year and shall have his or her training
incentive multiplier reset to one (1) for the following year.
(7) The ordinance may permit the city officer to carry forward no more than fifteen (15) hours of excess credit
hours earned in one (1) calendar year to apply to the minimum fifteen (15) hours training unit required in the
next calendar year.[ "Excess hours" means credit hours earned beyond fifteen (15) during a single calendar
year.]
(8) The ordinance shall require the city officer to present proof of his or her completion of the annual training unit
and shall establish the time that the city officers shall receive their training incentive payments.
(9) Each city shall, in the ordinance establishing the city officers training program, establish a policy regarding the
reimbursement to the city officer, or payment to the provider for the city officer's attendance of an event
hosting a course where the officer seeks to earn credit.
(10) The ordinance shall specify criteria for the presentation of proof of attendance by city officers and the criteria
for the evaluation of a course's relevance to the duties and functions of city officers and the functions of city
governments. In addition to other courses that may be deemed relevant by the city, courses that provide
instruction on statutory powers and duties of cities and city officers, intergovernmental relationships,
municipal finance and budgeting, municipal taxation, ethics, open records, open meetings, economic
development, or municipal police powers shall satisfy the criteria established in the ordinance.
Section 3. KRS 45A.380 is amended to read as follows:
A local public agency may contract or purchase through noncompetitive negotiation only when a written
determination is made that competition is not feasible and it is further determined in writing by a designee of the local
public agency that:
(1) An emergency exists which will cause public harm as a result of the delay in competitive procedures;
(2) There is a single source within a reasonable geographical area of the product or service to be procured;
(3) The contract is for the services of a licensed professional, such as attorney, physician, psychiatrist,
psychologist, certified public accountant, registered nurse, or educational specialist; a technician such as a
plumber, electrician, carpenter, or mechanic; or an artist such as a sculptor, aesthetic painter, or musician,
provided, however, that this provision shall not apply to architects or engineers providing construction
management services rather than professional architect or engineer services;
(4) The contract is for the purchase of perishable foods, such as meat, fish, poultry, egg products, fresh vegetables,
and fresh fruits;
(5) The contract is for replacement parts where the need cannot be reasonably anticipated and stockpiling is not
feasible;
(6) The contract is for proprietary items for resale;
(7) In school districts the contract relates to an enterprise in which the buying or selling by students is a part of the
educational experience;
(8) The contract or purchase is for expenditures made on authorized trips outside of the boundaries of the local
public agency;
(9) The contract is for the purchase of supplies which are sold at public auction or by receiving sealed bids;
(10) The contract is for group life insurance, group health and accident insurance, group professional liability
insurance, worker's compensation insurance, and unemployment insurance;
(11) The contract is for a sale of supplies at reduced prices that will afford a purchase at savings to the local public
agency;[ or]
(12) The contract is with a private real estate developer and contains a requirement:
(a) That the developer increase the size or otherwise improve the collection capacity of the sanitary sewer
or storm water pipe serving the affected private real estate development; and
(b) That the local public agency pay only the proportional cost of increasing the size, or otherwise
improving the collection capacity, of the sanitary sewer or storm water pipe over the original collection
capacity; or

CHAPTER 90 3
(13) The contract is for the purchase of used vehicles or used equipment and the purchase price does not exceed
seventy-five percent (75%) of the manufacturer's suggested retail price for the model year for a vehicle or
date of manufacture for equipment for the same or similar vehicles or equipment.
Section 4. KRS 424.260 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except where a statute specifically fixes a larger sum as the minimum for a requirement of advertisement for
bids, a[no] city, county, or district, or board or commission of a city or county, or sheriff or county clerk, shall
not[may] make a contract, lease, or other agreement for:
(a) Materials;
(b) Supplies, except for supplies that are:
1. Perishable foods such as meat, poultry, fish, egg products, fresh vegetables, and fresh fruits; or
2. Sold at public auction;
(c) Equipment, except used vehicles and used equipment if the purchase price does not exceed seventy-
five percent (75%) of the manufacturer's suggested retail price for the model year for a vehicle or
date of manufacture for equipment for the same or similar vehicles or equipment; or
(d) Contractual services other than professional;
involving an expenditure of more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) without first making newspaper
advertisement for bids. This subsection shall not apply to the transfer of property between governmental
agencies as authorized in KRS 82.083(4)(a).
(2) If the fiscal court requires that the sheriff or county clerk advertise for bids on expenditures of less than forty
thousand dollars ($40,000), the fiscal court requirement shall prevail.
(3) (a) Nothing in this statute shall limit or restrict the ability of a local school district to acquire supplies and
equipment outside of the bidding procedure if those supplies and equipment meet the specifications of
the contracts awarded by the Office of Material and Procurement Services in the Office of the
Controller within the Finance and Administration Cabinet or a federal, local, or cooperative agency and
are available for purchase elsewhere at a lower price. A board of education may purchase those supplies
and equipment without advertising for bids if, prior to making the purchases, the board of education
obtains certification from the district's finance or purchasing officer that the items to be purchased meet
the standards and specifications fixed by state price contract, federal (GSA) price contract, or the bid of
another school district whose bid specifications allow other districts to utilize their bids, and that the
sales price is lower than that established by the various price contract agreements or available through
the bid of another school district whose bid specifications would allow the district to utilize their bid.
(b) The procedures set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be available to the district for any
specific item once the bidding procedure has been initiated by an invitation to bid and a publication of
specifications for that specific item has been published. In the event that all bids are rejected, the district
may again avail itself of the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(4) This requirement shall not apply in an emergency if the chief executive officer of the city, county, or district
has duly certified that an emergency exists, and has filed a copy of the certificate with the chief financial
officer of the city, county, or district, or if the sheriff or the county clerk has certified that an emergency exists,
and has filed a copy of the certificate with the clerk of the court where his necessary office expenses are fixed
pursuant to KRS 64.345 or 64.530, or if the superintendent of the board of education has duly certified that an
emergency exists, and has filed a copy of the certificate with the chief state school officer.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply for the purchase of wholesale electric power for
resale to the ultimate customers of a municipal utility organized under KRS 96.550 to 96.900.
(6) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to purchases for products or services made pursuant to KRS
82.084.
Section 5. KRS 75.031 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Upon creation of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire department district as provided in
KRS 75.010, the affairs of the district shall be conducted by the board of trustees consisting of
seven (7) members, four (4) to be elected by the members of the district as hereinafter set out and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
three (3) to be appointed by the county judge/executive or the mayor in a consolidated local
government pursuant to the provisions of KRS 67C.139.
2. Two (2) members of the board of trustees shall be elected by the members of the firefighters of
the district and shall be full-time paid employees of the district or members of the district who
personally reside in the district.
3. Two (2) members of the board of trustees shall be property owners who own real or personal
property which is subject to the fire protection tax pursuant to KRS 75.040, who personally
reside in the district, and who are not active firefighters and shall be elected by the property
owners of the district. Property owners voting to select representatives to the board of trustees
shall have attained the age of eighteen (18).
4. The county judge/executive of the county in which the greater part of the district is located shall,
with the approval of the fiscal court, appoint three (3) members of the board of trustees who
personally reside in the district. In counties containing a city of the first class, trustees appointed
by the county judge/executive to serve in volunteer fire prevention districts shall reside within
the boundaries of that county. In counties governed by a consolidated local government, trustees
appointed by the mayor to serve in volunteer fire prevention districts shall reside within the
boundaries of the consolidated local government.
5. At the first election held after the district is formed, one (1) firefighter shall be elected to serve
on the board of trustees for a period of one (1) year and one (1) for a period of three (3) years,
and one (1) nonfirefighter property owner shall be elected to serve on the board of trustees for a
period of two (2) years and one (1) for a period of four (4) years. On the expiration of the
respective terms, the successor to each shall have the same qualifications as his or her
predecessor and shall be elected for a term of four (4) years. The original appointed members of
the board of trustees shall be appointed for terms of one (1), two (2), and three (3) years
respectively. On the expiration of the respective terms, the successors to each shall be appointed
for a term of three (3) years.
6. Upon the establishment of a consolidated local government, incumbent members shall continue
to serve until the expiration of their current term of office.
7. In the event of a vacancy in the term of an appointed or elected trustee, the county
judge/executive shall appoint with the approval of the fiscal court a trustee for the remainder of
the term, except in a county containing a consolidated local government. In a county containing a
consolidated local government, the mayor pursuant to the provisions of KRS 67C.139 shall
appoint a trustee for the remainder of the term.
(b) An appointed trustee may be removed from office as provided by KRS 65.007.
(c) 1. No person shall be an elected trustee who is not a resident of the district, except as provided in
subsection (1)(a)2. of this section, and who, at the time of his or her election, is not a citizen of
Kentucky and has not attained the age of twenty-one (21).
2. Except for trustees elected under subsection (1)(a)2. of this section, a vacancy shall be
declared to exist if an elected trustee no longer resides within the boundaries of the district at
any time during his or her term of office.
(d) Unless otherwise provided by law, an elected firefighter trustee may be removed from office by the
mayor of a consolidated local government, or in a county not containing a consolidated local
government, by the county judge/executive of the county in which the greater part of the district is
located. An elected firefighter trustee may be removed after a hearing with notice as required by KRS
Chapter 424, for inefficiency, neglect of duty, malfeasance, or conflict of interest. The hearing shall be
initiated and chaired by the county judge/executive of a county or the mayor of a consolidated local
government, who shall prepare a written statement setting forth the reasons for removal. The trustee to
be removed shall be notified of his or her proposed removal and the reasons for the proposed removal
by registered mail sent to his or her last known address at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing. The
person proposed to be removed may employ counsel to represent him or her. A record of the hearing
shall be made by the county judge/executive or mayor respectively.
(e) The removal of an elected firefighter trustee of a fire protection district shall be subject to the approval
of the fiscal court of the county in which the greater part of the district is located in those counties not

CHAPTER 90 5
containing a consolidated local government or the legislative council in a county containing a
consolidated local government.
(f) An elected firefighter trustee removed pursuant to paragraphs (d) and (e) of this subsection may appeal,
within ten (10) days of the rendering of the decision of the fiscal court or legislative council,
respectively, to the Circuit Court of the county in which the greater part of the district is located. The
scope of the appeal shall be limited to whether the county judge/executive, mayor, legislative council,
or the fiscal court respectively, abused their discretion in removing the trustee.
(2) The elective offices of members of the board of trustees shall be filled by an election to be held once each year
on the fourth Saturday of June between the hours of 11:00 a.m. and 2:00 p.m. The polls shall be located at the
principal fire house in the district. The date, time, and place of the election shall be advertised in accordance
with KRS 424.120. This notice shall be advertised at least thirty (30) days prior to the election date and shall
include the names and addresses of the candidates to be voted on for each position of trustee. In lieu of the
published notice for the election of the firefighter trustees, written notice containing the information required
to be advertised may be sent by first-class mail to each member of the firefighters of the fire protection district
or volunteer fire department district, addressed to the firefighter at his or her residence, at least thirty (30) days
prior to the election date. The nominations for candidates for trustees both representing the firefighters and the
property owners residing in the district shall be made in accordance with the bylaws of the department. The
terms of the three (3) trustees appointed by the county judge/executive or mayor shall start at the same time as
the terms of the elected trustees. On or before the beginning of the second fiscal or calendar year, depending
on which basis the fire protection or volunteer fire department district is being operated, after June 16, 1966,
all departments organized prior to June 16, 1966, shall increase their boards of trustees from three (3) to seven
(7) members and elect the elective members in the manner set forth herein.
(3) The trustees shall elect from their number a chairman, a secretary, and a treasurer, the latter of whom shall
give bond in an amount as shall be determined by the county judge/executive of the county in which the
greater part of the fire protection district is located or the mayor in a consolidated local government,
conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the duties of his or her office, and the faithful accounting for all
funds which may come into his or her possession as treasurer. The premiums on the bonds shall be paid out of
the funds of the district.
Section 6. KRS 273.207 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The affairs of a corporation shall be managed by a board of directors. Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, directors need not be residents of this state or members of the corporation unless the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws so require. The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may prescribe other
qualifications for directors.
(2) The members of the board of directors of a fire department organized under this chapter shall be residents
of the geographic area served by the corporation. A vacancy shall be declared to exist if a member no
longer resides within the geographic area served by the corporation at any time during his or her term of
office.
Section 7. On the effective date of this section of this Act:
(1) A vacancy shall be declared to exist in the office of any board of trustees member serving under Section
5 of this Act who does not qualify under subsection (1)(a)2. of Section 5 of this Act, and the vacancy shall be filled in
accordance with Section 5 of this Act; and
(2) A vacancy shall be declared to exist in the office of any board of director member serving under Section
6 of this Act who does not personally reside in the geographic area served by the corporation, and the vacancy shall
be filled in accordance with KRS 273.213.
Section 8. Whereas it is critical to ensure the representation of residents served by fire protection entities,
an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 5, 6, and 7 of this Act take effect upon its passage and approval by the
Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version